Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 414.665 is amended to read:
414.665. (1) As used in this section, “traditional health worker” includes any of the following:
(a) A community health worker.
(b) A personal health navigator.
(c) A peer wellness specialist.
(d) A peer support specialist.
(e) A doula.
(f) A tribal traditional health worker.
(2) In consultation  with the Traditional Health Workers Commission established under ORS
413.600, the Oregon Health Authority, for purposes related  to the regulation of traditional health
workers, shall adopt by rule:
(a) The qualification criteria,  including education and training requirements, for the traditional
health workers utilized by coordinated  care organizations, including [ distinct qualification criteria for
birth doulas and postpartum doulas ] qualification criteria for  the distinct perinatal doula pro-
vider types of birth doula and postpartum doula ;
(b) Appropriate professional designations for supervisors of the traditional health workers; and
(c) Processes by which other occupational classifications may be approved to supervise the tra-
ditional health workers.
(3) The criteria and requirements established under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Must be broad enough to encompass  the potential unique needs of any coordinated care or-
ganization;
(b) Must meet requirements of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to  qualify for
federal financial participation; and
(c) May not require certification by the Home Care Commission.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Health Authority shall  adopt by rule the qualification criteria
for the distinct perinatal  doula provider types of birth doula and postpartum doula, as re-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 1
quired under the amendments to ORS 414.665  by section 1 of this 2026 Act, no later than
January 1, 2028.
SECTION 3. ORS 414.667 is repealed.
SECTION 4.  ORS 414.668 is amended to read:
414.668. (1) In determining the types and extent of health care and services to  be provided to
medical assistance recipients under ORS 414.065, the  Oregon Health Authority and a coordinated
care organization shall ensure that recipients have access to services provided by doulas[ , lactation
counselors and lactation educators ].
(2) The services described in subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Include a minimum of 24 hours of services, in addition to labor and  delivery services, re-
gardless of birth outcome, with an option for the authority or a  coordinated care organization to
approve additional hours based on need;
(b) Be  sufficient to support recipients’ robust maternal health and support positive birth out-
comes; and
(c) Be provided:
(A) By an individual or organization from the community of the  recipient, using language,
structures and settings familiar to members of the community; or
(B) If an individual or organization from the  community of the recipient is not available, by a
provider that has received cultural competency training within the preceding three years.
(3) Access to [ doulas, lactation counselors and lactation educators ] doula services :
(a) Must be made available without a referral or signature from another  health care provider;
and
(b) May not  require [ a signature from or supervision by any other health care provider ] prior
authorization, except as necessary to approve additional hours based on need  as described in sub-
section (2)(a) of this section.
(4) A  coordinated care organization shall make information about how to access services pro-
vided by a doula[ , lactation counselor or lactation educator ] available on a website operated by or
on behalf of the coordinated care  organization and shall provide the information in print whenever
a printed explanation of benefits is available.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 414.668, as amended by section 4 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
414.668. (1) In determining  the types and extent of health care and services to be provided to
medical assistance recipients under ORS 414.065, the  Oregon Health Authority and a coordinated
care organization shall ensure that recipients have access to services provided by doulas.
(2) The services described in subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Include a minimum of 12 visits or  24 hours of services , or  a comparable combination of
visits and hours , in addition to labor and delivery services, regardless of birth  outcome, with an
option for the authority or a coordinated care  organization to approve additional hours based on
need[;].
(b) Be sufficient to support recipients’ robust maternal health and support positive birth
outcomes[ ; and].
(c) Be provided:
(A) By an individual or organization from the community of the  recipient, using language,
structures and settings familiar to members of the community; or
(B) If an individual or organization from the  community of the recipient is not available, by a
provider that has received cultural competency training within the preceding three years.
(3) Access to doula services:
(a) Must be made available without a referral or signature  from another health care provider;
and
(b) May not require prior authorization,  except as necessary to approve additional hours based
on need as described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(4) A coordinated care organization shall make information about how to access services  pro-
vided by a doula available on a  website operated by or on behalf of the coordinated care organiza-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 2
tion and shall provide the information in print  whenever a printed explanation of benefits is
available.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to ORS 414.668  by section 5 of this 2026 Act apply to
contracts between coordinated care organizations and the Oregon Health Authority entered
into, amended or renewed on or after January 1, 2028.
(2) A contract  between a coordinated care organization and the authority that was en-
tered into, amended or renewed  before January 1, 2028, may authorize medical assistance
coverage of services consistent with the amendments to ORS 414.668 by section  5 of this 2026
Act.
SECTION 7.  ORS 414.669 is amended to read:
414.669. [(1)] The Oregon Health Authority,  in coordination with the Traditional Health Workers
Commission, shall in each even-numbered year review, and revise if necessary, any rates of  re-
imbursement in the state medical assistance program for doulas. When reviewing and revising rates
of reimbursement, the authority shall consider factors including retention  of doulas and the need to
ensure that a career as  a doula is financially sustainable, access to culturally specific doulas and
evidence-based factors and  empirical studies related to the cost-effectiveness of services provided
by doulas.
[(2) The authority shall in each even-numbered year review,  and revise if necessary, any rates of
reimbursement in the state medical assistance program for  lactation counselors and lactation educators.
When reviewing and revising rates of reimbursement, the authority  shall consider factors including
retention of lactation counselors and lactation educators and  the need to ensure that a career as a
lactation counselor or  lactation educator is financially sustainable, access to culturally specific lactation
counselors and lactation educators and  evidence-based factors and empirical studies related to the
cost-effectiveness of services provided by lactation counselors and lactation educators. ]
SECTION 8. Section 9 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 9. (1) As used in this section, “lactation counselor” has the  meaning given that
term in section 11 of this 2026 Act.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority and a coordinated care organization shall ensure that
medical assistance  recipients have access to services provided by lactation counselors and
that access  to those services is made available without a referral from another health care
provider.
(3) A coordinated care organization shall make  information about how to access services
provided by a lactation counselor available on a website operated by or on behalf of the co-
ordinated care organization and shall provide the information in print  whenever a printed
explanation of benefits is available.
(4) The authority shall in each even-numbered year review, and revise if necessary,  any
rates of reimbursement in the state medical assistance program for lactation  counselors.
When reviewing and revising rates of reimbursement, the authority shall consider retention
of lactation counselors as a factor.
SECTION 10.
Section 9 of this 2026  Act applies to contracts between coordinated care
organizations and the Oregon Health Authority entered into, amended or renewed on or after
January 1, 2028.
SECTION 11. (1) As used in this  section, “lactation counselor” has the meaning given
that term by the Traditional Health Workers Commission by rule.
(2) The commission shall  adopt rules to establish a voluntary registration for lactation
counselors. The rules adopted under this section must include at least rules to:
(a) Establish continuing education requirements for lactation counselors;
(b) Establish standards of practice for lactation counselors;
(c) Establish a voluntary registration process and requirements  for lactation counselors;
and
(d) Specify that a lactation counselor may provide services to a client who was  pregnant
regardless of the client’s birth outcome.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 3
SECTION 12.  ORS 743A.081 is amended to read:
743A.081. (1) As used in this section[ :],
[(a)] “doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS [ 414.667] 414.025.
[(b) “Lactation counselor” and “lactation educator” have the meanings  given those terms in ORS
676.665.]
(2) A health  benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005, in this state that reimburses the cost of
pregnancy and childbirth expenses shall provide coverage  for services provided by doulas[ , lactation
counselors and lactation educators ].
(3) Covered services required under subsection (2) of this section  shall include a minimum of 24
hours of services,  in addition to labor and delivery services, regardless of birth outcome, with an
option for the health benefit plan to approve additional hours based on need.
(4) Except for coverage of additional hours based on need as described in subsection  (3) of this
section, the health benefit plan described in subsection (2) of this  section may not require prior
authorization, a referral from another health care provider or a  signature from or supervision by
any other health care provider for coverage of services described in this section.
(5) A  health benefit plan that provides the services described in subsection (2) of this section
shall provide information on how to access doulas[ , lactation counselors and lactation educators ] to
all enrollees.
(6) The coverage required by subsection (2) of this section may be made subject  to provisions
of the policy, certificate or contract that  apply to other benefits under the policy, certificate or
contract, including, but not limited to, provisions related to deductibles and coinsurance.
(7) The health benefit plan shall reimburse the cost for coverage of services described in  this
section up to a total amount that is  not less than $3,760. On January 1 of each year, the Department
of Consumer  and Business Services shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subsection to reflect
the percentage  changes in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers, West Region (All
Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of  Labor or
a successor agency, and may vary from year to year.
(8) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 743A.081, as amended by section 12 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
743A.081. (1) As used in this section, “doula” [ has the meaning given that  term] means a doula,
as defined in ORS 414.025 , who is certified and registered by the Oregon Health Authority .
[(2) A health  benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005, in this state that reimburses the cost of
pregnancy and childbirth expenses shall provide coverage for services provided  by doulas, lactation
counselors and lactation educators. ]
[(3) Covered services required under subsection (2)  of this section shall include a minimum of 24
hours of services, in addition to  labor and delivery services, regardless of birth outcome, with an option
for the health benefit plan to approve additional hours based on need. ]
(2) A  health benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005, in this state that provides coverage
for pregnancy and childbirth shall provide coverage for services provided by doulas up  to
$3,760 of coverage per 12-month period under a plan or per calendar year.
(3) If additional doula services are needed after the benefit amount specified in subsection
(2) of this section is exhausted, a health benefit plan may approve  the additional services,
subject to reasonable medical management techniques.
(4) Except for [ coverage  of additional hours ] the approval of additional services  based on need
as described in subsection (3) of this section, the health benefit plan described in subsection (2)  of
this section may not require prior authorization, a referral from another health care  provider or a
signature from or supervision by any other  health care provider for coverage of services described
in this section.
(5) A health benefit plan may develop payment models that enable the member  to receive
the following services within the benefit amount described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Support during labor and delivery; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 4
(b) Approximately 12 visits or 24 hours, or a comparable combination thereof, of  prenatal
or postpartum services.
(6)(a) Covered services under subsection (2) of this section shall be limited to services
that relate directly to medical services covered by the health benefit plan.
(b) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt rules specifying the
types of services  that are not covered medical services and that are consistent with appli-
cable definitions and guidance adopted by the federal Internal Revenue Service on or before
the effective date of this 2026 Act.
[(5)] (7)  A health benefit plan that provides  the services described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion shall provide information on how to access doulas to all enrollees.
[(6)] (8)  The coverage required by subsection (2) of this section may be made subject to pro-
visions of the policy, certificate or contract that apply to other benefits under the policy, certificate
or contract, including, but not limited to, provisions related to deductibles and coinsurance.
[(7) The health benefit  plan shall reimburse the cost for coverage of services described in this sec-
tion up to a total amount that is not less than $3,760. On January 1 of each year, the Department of
Consumer and Business Services shall adjust the dollar limit  provided by this subsection to reflect the
percentage changes in the Consumer Price Index for all  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items),
as published by the Bureau of  Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or a successor
agency, and may vary from year to year. ]
(9) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this  section, a health benefit plan described in
subsection (2) of this section shall reimburse the  cost of coverage of services up to a total
amount established in subsection (2) of this section. Beginning with the 2029 calendar year,
the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall  annually adjust the maximum
amount of required coverage under subsection  (2) of this section by multiplying the amount
by the percentage change in  the monthly averaged Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the
United States  Department of Labor, for the 12 consecutive months ending on the imme-
diately preceding December 31 compared to the monthly averaged Consumer Price Index  for
All Urban  Consumers, West Region (All Items), for the 12 consecutive months ending on
December 31, 2028.
[(8)] (10) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 14.
(1) The  amendments to ORS 743A.081 by section 13 of this 2026 Act apply
to health benefit plans that are issued,  renewed or extended on or after January 1, 2028, and
to enrollees in a health  benefit plan who receive services from a doula certified and regis-
tered by the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) A health benefit plan  that was issued, renewed or extended before January 1, 2028,
may provide covered services consistent with ORS 743A.081, as amended by section 13 of  this
2026 Act, and enrollees  in a health benefit plan that was issued, renewed or extended before
January 1, 2028, may  receive services from a doula certified and registered by the Oregon
Health Authority.
SECTION 15.  Section 21, chapter 539, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 21.  The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall issue guidance on the  im-
plementation of [ section 17 of  this 2025 Act ] ORS 743A.081 , including alignment with the rules and
requirements for  doulas[ , lactation counselors and lactation educators ] as described by the Oregon
Health Authority.
SECTION 16. Section 17 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part  of the Insurance
Code.
SECTION 17. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Lactation counselor”  has the meaning given that term in section 11 of this 2026 Act.
(2) A health benefit plan issued  in this state that provides coverage for pregnancy and
childbirth expenses shall provide coverage for services provided by lactation counselors and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 5
may not require prior authorization, a referral from another health care  provider, approval
or a signature from another health  care provider or supervision by another health care
provider for coverage of services described in this section.
(3) A health benefit plan that provides the services described in this section shall provide
information on how to access lactation counselors to all enrollees.
(4) The coverage described in this section may be made subject to  provisions of the
health benefit plan that apply to other benefits under the plan, including but not limited  to
provisions relating to deductibles or coinsurance.
(5) The Department of Consumer  and Business Services shall issue guidance on coverage
of lactation  counselors required by this section and on the implementation of that required
coverage, including alignment with the rules and requirements for lactation counselors  as
established by the Oregon Health Authority, to the extent practicable.
SECTION 18. Section 17 of this  2026 Act applies to health benefit plans that are issued,
renewed or extended on or after January 1, 2028, and to enrollees  in health benefit plans is-
sued, renewed or extended on or after January 1, 2028.
SECTION 19.  ORS 676.380 is amended to read:
676.380. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
[(b) “Lactation counselor” and “lactation educator” have the meanings  given those terms in ORS
676.665.]
[(c)] (b) “Community-based services during the  perinatal period” includes, but is not limited to,
services provided by a doula[ , lactation counselor or lactation educator ] to a pregnant or  postpartum
individual from conception through one year postpartum.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a community-based perinatal services access
program to support activities that increase access to culturally specific and  culturally competent
community-based services during the perinatal period. The program must  issue grants or contracts
to eligible entities with a demonstrated ability to offer the activities described in  this subsection,
including culturally  specific organizations, the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in this state,
nonprofit organizations and businesses.
(b) Grants and contracts  issued under this section  may be used for purposes including, but not
limited to:
(A) Paying  for costs of required training and education to provide community-based services
during the perinatal period, including tuition, fees, books and other materials and supplies;
(B) Providing wages and financial benefits for individuals who are training to provide
community-based services during the perinatal period;
(C) Outreach and recruitment to  attract individuals to training programs to provide
community-based services during the perinatal period;
(D) Funding for culturally specific or community-based  organizations and programs to:
(i) Establish or expand community-based services during the perinatal period;
(ii) Support billing insurance for community-based services during the perinatal period;
(iii) Provide training and mentoring  for providers of community-based services during the
perinatal period; and
(iv) Conduct  consumer or provider education and research regarding community-based services
during the perinatal period; and
(E) Funding to provide technical  assistance related to billing and consumer or provider outreach
and education to:
(i) Doulas; and
(ii) Organizations that employ doulas or contract with doulas to provide doula services.
(3) An eligible entity  that receives a grant or contract  issued under this section may use the
grant or contract  to provide funding to partner entities that are organized to meet the  purposes
of the program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 6
(4) The  authority may administer the program directly or contract with a third party to admin-
ister the program. If the authority contracts with  a third party, the third party must have experi-
ence in implementing state-funded grant programs  that utilize community and stakeholder
engagement.
(5) The authority  may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public or
private, to carry out the provisions of this section. Moneys received under this section  shall be de-
posited in the Community-Based Perinatal Services Access Fund established under ORS 676.383.
SECTION 19a.  ORS 676.380, as amended by section 19 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
676.380. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Lactation counselor”  has the meaning given that term in section 11 of this 2026 Act.
[(b)] (c)  “Community-based services during the perinatal  period” includes, but is not limited to,
services provided by a doula or lactation counselor  to a pregnant or postpartum individual from
conception through one year postpartum.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a community-based perinatal services access
program to support activities that increase access to culturally specific and  culturally competent
community-based services during the perinatal period. The program must issue grants or  contracts
to eligible entities  with a demonstrated ability to offer the activities described in this subsection,
including culturally specific organizations,  the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in this state,
nonprofit organizations and businesses.
(b) Grants and contracts issued under this section may be used  for purposes including, but not
limited to:
(A) Paying  for costs of required training and education to provide community-based services
during the perinatal period, including tuition, fees, books and other materials and supplies;
(B) Providing wages and financial benefits for individuals who are training to provide
community-based services during the perinatal period;
(C) Outreach and recruitment to  attract individuals to training programs to provide
community-based services during the perinatal period;
(D) Funding for culturally specific or community-based organizations and programs to:
(i) Establish or expand community-based services during the perinatal period;
(ii) Support billing insurance for community-based services during the perinatal period;
(iii) Provide training and mentoring  for providers of community-based services during the
perinatal period; and
(iv) Conduct  consumer or provider education and research regarding community-based services
during the perinatal period; and
(E) Funding to provide technical  assistance related to billing and consumer or provider outreach
and education to:
(i) Doulas; and
(ii) Organizations that employ doulas or contract with doulas to provide doula services.
(3) An eligible  entity that receives a grant or contract issued under this section may use the
grant or contract to provide funding to partner entities that are  organized to meet the purposes of
the program.
(4) The  authority may administer the program directly or contract with a third party to admin-
ister the program. If the authority contracts with  a third party, the third party must have experi-
ence in implementing state-funded grant programs  that utilize community and stakeholder
engagement.
(5) The authority may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether  public or
private, to carry out  the provisions of this section. Moneys received under this section shall be de-
posited in the Community-Based Perinatal Services Access Fund established under ORS 676.383.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 676.386 is amended to read:
676.386. (1) As used in this section[ :],
[(a)] “doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 7
[(b) “Lactation counselor” and “lactation educator”  have the meanings given those terms in ORS
676.665.]
(2) To the extent practicable, a doula[ , lactation counselor  or lactation educator ] shall strive to
provide services that are culturally specific, as defined in ORS 413.256, to a client or patient.
SECTION 20a.  ORS 676.386, as amended by section 20 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
676.386. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Lactation counselor”  has the meaning given that term in section 11 of this 2026 Act.
(2) To the extent practicable, a doula  or lactation counselor  shall strive to provide  services
that are culturally specific, as defined in ORS 413.256, to a client or patient.
SECTION 21.  ORS 676.665 is amended to read:
676.665. As used in ORS 676.665 to 676.689:
(1) “Lactation consultant” means a person licensed to practice lactation consultation.
(2) “Lactation consultation” means the clinical application  of scientific principles and evidence
to provide care related to lactation to childbearing families. Lactation  consultation includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) Client assessment through systematic collection of data;
(b) Data analysis;
(c) Creation of a care plan;
(d) Implementation of the care  plan, including demonstration and instructions to clients and
communication with the clients’ primary care provider;
(e) Evaluation of client outcomes;
(f) Problem identification and treatment;
(g) Recommendation and use of assistive devices; and
(h) Lactation education to childbearing families and to health care providers.
[(3) “Lactation counselor” means a person certified by the Academy  of Lactation Policy and Prac-
tice, or its successor organization, as approved  by the Health Licensing Office by rule, as a clinical
lactation care provider who has demonstrated the necessary skills, knowledge and  attitude to provide
clinical support to families that are thinking, or  have questions, about breastfeeding or that have
problems with breastfeeding. ]
[(4) “Lactation educator” means  a person certified by the Childbirth and Postpartum Professional
Association, or its successor organization, as approved by the office  by rule, as a certified lactation
educator to educate,  counsel and support families by providing evidence-based information about
lactation and breastfeeding. ]
SECTION 22.
ORS 676.671 is repealed.
SECTION 23. (1) There is created the Oregon Perinatal Collaborative in  the Oregon
Health and Science University.
(2) The responsibilities of the Oregon Perinatal Collaborative shall include:
(a) Coordinating statewide efforts for quality improvement  in maternal and infant health;
and
(b) Developing policy recommendations to further maternal and infant health.
SECTION 24.
An entity that received  a grant under ORS 676.380 before the operative date
specified in section  25 of this 2026 Act for purposes related to lactation counselors or
lactation educators may use the grant for purposes  related to lactation counselors on and
after the operative date specified in section 25 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 25. (1) Sections 9, 11 and 17 of this 2026 Act and the amendments to  ORS
414.668, 676.380, 676.386 and 743A.081 by sections 5, 13, 19a and 20a of this 2026 Act  become
operative on January 1, 2028.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority,  the Department of Consumer and Business Services,
a coordinated care organization and an insurer may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is necessary to enable those entities to exer-
cise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the  du-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 8
ties, functions and powers  conferred on those entities by sections 9, 11 and 17 of this 2026
Act and the  amendments to ORS 414.668, 676.380, 676.386 and 743A.081 by sections 5, 13, 19a
and 20a of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 26. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 19, 2026
Repassed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1568 (SB 1568-B) Page 9